Illinois, session 104th, HB3110.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-12024 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12024 new)7    Sec. 5-12024. Prohibition on crime-free housing 8ordinances.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Contact with a law enforcement agency or other emergency 11service" means any interaction with a law enforcement agency, 12including, but not limited to, notice, stop, arrest or 13detention, conviction or charge, or calls to or response by a 14law enforcement agency or other emergency service. 15    "Penalty against a landlord" includes, but is not limited 16to, an action against a landlord in response to a landlord 17failing to implement or enforce an ordinance, resolution, 18policy, program, or other regulation prohibited by this 19Section, including, but not limited to, revoking, suspending, 20or refusing to issue a permit or license otherwise required by 21the county for a property owner or landlord to engage in the 22business of leasing within the county.23    (b) A county may not adopt, enforce, or implement an   HB3110- 2 -LRB104 09693 RTM 19759 b1ordinance, resolution, policy, program, or other regulation 2affecting a tenancy that does any of the following:3        (1) imposes or threatens to impose a penalty against a 4    resident, property owner, tenant, landlord, or other 5    person solely as a consequence of contact with a law 6    enforcement agency or other emergency service;7        (2) requires or promotes a property owner or landlord 8    to do, or imposes a penalty on a property owner or landlord 9    for the failure to do, any of the following:10            (A) evict or penalize a tenant because of the 11        tenant's association with another tenant or household 12        member who has had contact with a law enforcement 13        agency or other emergency service or has a criminal 14        conviction;15            (B) evict, refuse to lease or renew a lease, or 16        otherwise penalize a tenant because of the tenant's 17        criminal history or alleged unlawful conduct or 18        arrest;19            (C) include a provision in a lease or rental 20        agreement that provides as grounds for eviction any 21        cause that is in conflict with State or federal law; or22            (D) conduct criminal background checks of 23        prospective or current tenants; however, nothing 24        limits a property owner or landlord from voluntarily 25        conducting a criminal background check;26        (3) defines as a nuisance any contact with a law   HB3110- 3 -LRB104 09693 RTM 19759 b1    enforcement agency or other emergency service by a tenant 2    or any request by a tenant, landlord, resident, or 3    property owner for emergency assistance;4        (4) requires a tenant to obtain a certificate of 5    occupancy as a condition of tenancy or turning on 6    utilities; or7        (5) establishes, maintains, or promotes a registry of 8    tenants for the purposes of discouraging or excluding a 9    tenant on the registry from rental housing within the 10    county.11    (c) An aggrieved party may file an action in circuit 12court, including for injunctive relief, monetary relief, 13attorney's fees, and costs, against a county to enforce the 14provisions of this Section. Nothing in this Section shall be 15construed to allow an aggrieved party to file or sustain an 16action against a landlord, owner, management company, leasing 17agent, or real estate agent or any other person or entity other 18than the county.19    (d) A home rule county may not regulate tenancy in a manner 20inconsistent with this Section. This Section is a limitation 21under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 22Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule 23units of powers and functions exercised by the State.  24    (55 ILCS 5/5-1005.10 rep.)25    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by repealing   HB3110- 4 -LRB104 09693 RTM 19759 b1Section 5-1005.10. 2    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 3adding Section 11-13-30 as follows: 4    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-30 new)5    Sec. 11-13-30. Prohibition on crime-free housing 6ordinances.7    (a) As used in this Section:8    "Contact with a law enforcement agency or other emergency 9service" means any interaction with a law enforcement agency, 10including, but not limited to, notice, stop, arrest or 11detention, conviction or charge, or calls to or response by a 12law enforcement agency or other emergency service.13    "Penalty against a landlord" includes, but is not limited 14to, an action against a landlord in response to a landlord 15failing to implement or enforce an ordinance, resolution, 16policy, program, or other regulation prohibited by this 17Section, including, but not limited to, revoking, suspending, 18or refusing to issue a permit or license otherwise required by 19the municipality for a property owner or landlord to engage in 20the business of leasing within the municipality.21    (b) A municipality may not adopt, enforce, or implement an 22ordinance, resolution, policy, program, or other regulation 23affecting a tenancy that does any of the following:24        (1) imposes or threatens to impose a penalty against a   HB3110- 5 -LRB104 09693 RTM 19759 b1    resident, property owner, tenant, landlord, or other 2    person solely as a consequence of contact with a law 3    enforcement agency or other emergency service;4        (2) requires or promotes a property owner or landlord 5    to do, or imposes a penalty on a property owner or landlord 6    for the failure to do, any of the following:7            (A) evict or penalize a tenant because of the 8        tenant's association with another tenant or household 9        member who has had contact with a law enforcement 10        agency or other emergency service or has a criminal 11        conviction;12            (B) evict, refuse to lease or renew a lease, or 13        otherwise penalize a tenant because of the tenant's 14        criminal history or alleged unlawful conduct or 15        arrest;16            (C) include a provision in a lease or rental 17        agreement that provides as grounds for eviction any 18        cause that is in conflict with State or federal law; or19            (D) conduct criminal background checks of 20        prospective or current tenants; however, nothing 21        limits a property owner or landlord from voluntarily 22        conducting a criminal background check;23        (3) defines as a nuisance any contact with a law 24    enforcement agency or other emergency service by a tenant 25    or any request by a tenant, landlord, resident, or 26    property owner for emergency assistance;  HB3110- 6 -LRB104 09693 RTM 19759 b1        (4) requires a tenant to obtain a certificate of 2    occupancy as a condition of tenancy or turning on 3    utilities; or4        (5) establishes, maintains, or promotes a registry of 5    tenants for the purposes of discouraging or excluding a 6    tenant on the registry from rental housing within the 7    municipality.8    (c) An aggrieved party may file an action in circuit 9court, including for injunctive relief, monetary relief, 10attorney's fees, and costs, against a municipality to enforce 11the provisions of this Section. Nothing in this Section shall 12be construed to allow an aggrieved party to file or sustain an 13action against a landlord, owner, management company, leasing 14agent, or real estate agent or any other person or entity other 15than the municipality.16    (d) A home rule municipality may not regulate tenancy in a 17manner inconsistent with this Section. This Section is a 18limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 19the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 20rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State.  21    (65 ILCS 5/1-2.1-5 rep.)22    Section 20. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 23repealing Section 1-2.1-5. 24    Section 25. The Housing Authorities Act is amended by   HB3110- 7 -LRB104 09693 RTM 19759 b1adding Section 8.25 as follows: 2    (310 ILCS 10/8.25 new)3    Sec. 8.25. Prohibition on crime-free housing ordinances.4    (a) As used in this Section:5    "Contact with a law enforcement agency or other emergency 6service" means any interaction with a law enforcement agency, 7including, but not limited to, notice, stop, arrest or 8detention, conviction or charge, or calls to or response by a 9law enforcement agency or other emergency service.10    "Penalty against a landlord" includes, but is not limited 11to, an action against a landlord, including an actual or 12threatened denial or termination of a subsidized housing 13contract, in response to a landlord failing to implement or 14enforce an ordinance, resolution, policy, program, or other 15regulation prohibited by this Section.16    (b) Unless otherwise required by federal law, a housing 17authority may not adopt their own, nor enforce or implement a 18county's or municipality's ordinance, resolution, policy, 19program, or other regulation affecting a tenancy that does any 20of the following:21        (1) imposes or threatens to impose a penalty against a 22    resident, property owner, tenant, landlord, or other 23    person solely as a consequence of contact with a law 24    enforcement agency or other emergency service;25        (2) requires or promotes a property owner or landlord   HB3110- 8 -LRB104 09693 RTM 19759 b1    to do, or imposes a penalty on a property owner or landlord 2    for the failure to do, any of the following:3            (A) evict or penalize a tenant because of the 4        tenant's association with another tenant or household 5        member who has had contact with a law enforcement 6        agency or other emergency service or has a criminal 7        conviction;8            (B) evict, refuse to lease or renew a lease, or 9        otherwise penalize a tenant because of the tenant's 10        criminal history or alleged unlawful conduct or 11        arrest; or12            (C) include a provision in a lease or rental 13        agreement that provides as grounds for eviction any 14        cause that is in conflict with State or federal law;15            (D) conduct criminal background checks of 16        prospective or current tenants; however, nothing 17        limits a property owner or landlord from voluntarily 18        conducting a criminal background check;19        (3) requires a tenant to obtain a certificate of 20    occupancy as a condition of tenancy or turning on 21    utilities; or22        (4) establishes, maintains, or promotes a registry of 23    tenants for the purposes of discouraging or excluding a 24    tenant on the registry from rental housing under the 25    housing authority's jurisdiction.26    (c) An aggrieved party may file an action in circuit   HB3110- 9 -LRB104 09693 RTM 19759 b1court, including for injunctive relief, monetary relief, 2attorney's fees, and costs, against a housing authority to 3enforce the provisions of this Section. Nothing in this 4Section shall be construed to allow an aggrieved party to file 5or sustain an action against a landlord, owner, management 6company, leasing agent, or real estate agent or any other 7person or entity other than the housing authority.8    (d) A home rule municipality may not have regulations that 9encourage or require housing authorities to act in a manner 10inconsistent with this Section. This Section is a limitation 11under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 12Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule 13units of powers and functions exercised by the State.  14    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 15severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.